Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.211

Values and traits recognized.

The legislature also recognizes that certain basic values and character traits are essential to individual liberty, fulfillment, and happiness. However, these values and traits are not intended to be assessed or be standards for graduation. The legislature intends that local communities have the responsibility for determining how these values and character traits are learned as determined by consensus at the local level. These values and traits include the importance of:

(1) Honesty, integrity, and trust;

(2) Respect for self and others;

(3) Responsibility for personal actions and commitments;

(4) Self-discipline and moderation;

(5) Diligence and a positive work ethic;

(6) Respect for law and authority;

(7) Healthy and positive behavior; and

(8) Family as the basis of society.

[ 1994 c 245 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 245 s 10: "Section 10 of this act shall take effect September 1, 1994." [ 1994 c 245 s 15.]